District of Columbia statutes.
23-1306

Chief assistant and other agency personnel; compensation.

The Director shall employ a chief assistant who shall be compensated as a member of the Senior Executive Service pursuant to section 5382 of title 5, United States Code . The Director shall employ such agency personnel as may be necessary properly to conduct the business of the agency. All employees other than the chief assistant shall receive compensation that is comparable to levels of compensation established for Federal pretrial services agencies.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 642, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)
Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 761, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11271(a)
Supersession of inconsistent laws, see § 1-611.16.
This section is referenced in § 1-611.16.
1981 Ed., § 23-1306.
1973 Ed., § 23-1306.